Utah statutes.
26-40-116.   Program to encourage appropriate emergency room use -- Application for waivers.

The program is subject to the provisions of Section 26-18-408 and shall apply for waivers in accordance with Subsection 26-18-408(5).



Enacted by Chapter 103, 2013 General Session

